Illinois, session 104th, SB2213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unemployment Insurance Act is amended by 5changing Section 612 and by adding Sections 503 and 504 as 6follows: 7    (820 ILCS 405/503 new)8    Sec. 503. School districts; unemployment insurance 9benefits.10    (a) As used in this Section, "school district" has the 11meaning given to that term in Section 2-3.25a of the School 12Code.13    (b) Subject to appropriation, school districts are 14eligible to receive unemployment insurance aid under this 15Section. For each fiscal year, a school district's aid is the 16difference between:17        (1) the net audited unemployment costs for the prior 18    fiscal year; and19        (2) the base period net audited unemployment costs 20    described in subsection (c).21    (c) The base period net audited unemployment costs equals 22the school district's fiscal year 2024 net audited 23unemployment costs.  SB2213- 2 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1    (d) If the total unemployment insurance aid for a fiscal 2year is greater than the annual appropriation for that year, 3the State Board of Education shall proportionately reduce the 4aid payment to each school district.5    (e) By January 15 of each year, the State Board of 6Education, in consultation with the Department of Employment 7Security, shall report to the General Assembly the balances in 8unemployment insurance aid accounts and information about the 9annual changes in reimbursable costs for school workers 10receiving unemployment insurance benefits. To the extent 11possible, the report shall break out the costs by district and 12major job classes. 13    (820 ILCS 405/504 new)14    Sec. 504. Institutions of higher education; unemployment 15insurance aid.16    (a) As used in this Section, "public institution of higher 17education" has the meaning given to that term in Section 1 of 18the Board of Higher Education Act.19    (b) Subject to appropriation, public institutions of 20higher education are eligible to receive unemployment 21insurance aid under this Section. For each fiscal year, a 22public institution of higher education's aid is the difference 23between:24        (1) the net audited unemployment costs for the prior 25    fiscal year; and  SB2213- 3 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1        (2) the base period net audited unemployment costs 2    described in subsection (c).3    (c) The base period net audited unemployment costs equals 4the public institution of higher education's fiscal year 2024 5net audited unemployment costs.6    (d) If the total eligible unemployment insurance aid for a 7fiscal year is greater than the annual appropriation for that 8year, the Board of Higher Education shall proportionately 9reduce the aid payment to each10    (e) By January 15 of each year, the Board of Higher 11Education, in consultation with the Department of Employment 12Security, shall report to the General Assembly the balances in 13unemployment insurance aid accounts and information about the 14annual changes in reimbursable costs for school workers 15receiving unemployment insurance benefits. To the extent 16possible, the report shall break out the costs by campus and 17major job classes.  18    (820 ILCS 405/612)  (from Ch. 48, par. 442)19    Sec. 612. Academic personnel; ineligibility between 20academic years or terms.21    A. Benefits based on wages for services which are 22employment under the provisions of Sections 211.1, 211.2, and 23302C shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, 24and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the 25basis of wages for other services which are employment under   SB2213- 4 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1this Act; except that:2        1. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 3    the basis of wages for employment in an instructional, 4    research, or principal administrative capacity performed 5    for an institution of higher education, for any week which 6    begins during the period between two successive academic 7    years, or during a similar period between two regular 8    terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of 9    paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's 10    contract, if the individual has a contract or contracts to 11    perform services in any such capacity for any institution 12    or institutions of higher education for both such academic 13    years or both such terms.14        This paragraph 1 shall apply with respect to any week 15    which begins prior to January 1, 1978.16        2. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 17    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 18    capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 1, 19    performed for an institution of higher learning, for any 20    week which begins after September 30, 1983, during a 21    period between two successive academic years or terms, if 22    the individual performed such service in the first of such 23    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 24    assurance that the individual will perform such service in 25    the second of such academic years or terms.26        3. (Blank). An individual shall be ineligible for   SB2213- 5 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1    benefits, on the basis of wages for service in employment 2    in any capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 3    1, performed for an institution of higher education, for 4    any week which begins after January 5, 1985, during an 5    established and customary vacation period or holiday 6    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 7    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 8    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 9    individual will perform such service in the period 10    immediately following such vacation period or holiday 11    recess.12    B. Benefits based on wages for services which are 13employment under the provisions of Sections 211.1 and 211.2 14shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and 15subject to the same conditions, as benefits payable on the 16basis of wages for other services which are employment under 17this Act, except that:18        1. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 19    the basis of wages for service in employment in an 20    instructional, research, or principal administrative 21    capacity performed for an educational institution, for any 22    week which begins after December 31, 1977, during a period 23    between two successive academic years, or during a similar 24    period between two regular terms, whether or not 25    successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave 26    provided for in the individual's contract, if the   SB2213- 6 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1    individual performed such service in the first of such 2    academic years (or terms) and if there is a contract or a 3    reasonable assurance that the individual will perform 4    service in any such capacity for any educational 5    institution in the second of such academic years (or 6    terms).7        2. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 8    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 9    capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 1, 10    performed for an educational institution, for any week 11    which begins after December 31, 1977, during a period 12    between two successive academic years or terms, if the 13    individual performed such service in the first of such 14    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 15    assurance that the individual will perform such service in 16    the second of such academic years or terms.17        3. (Blank). An individual shall be ineligible for 18    benefits, on the basis of wages for service in employment 19    in any capacity performed for an educational institution, 20    for any week which begins after January 5, 1985, during an 21    established and customary vacation period or holiday 22    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 23    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 24    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 25    individual will perform such service in the period 26    immediately following such vacation period or holiday   SB2213- 7 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1    recess.2        4. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits on 3    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 4    capacity performed in an educational institution while in 5    the employ of an educational service agency for any week 6    which begins after January 5, 1985, (a) during a period 7    between two successive academic years or terms, if the 8    individual performed such service in the first of such 9    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 10    assurance that the individual will perform such service in 11    the second of such academic years or terms; and (b) during 12    an established and customary vacation period or holiday 13    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 14    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 15    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 16    individual will perform such service in the period 17    immediately following such vacation period or holiday 18    recess. The term "educational service agency" means a 19    governmental agency or governmental entity which is 20    established and operated exclusively for the purpose of 21    providing such services to one or more educational 22    institutions.23    C. 1. If benefits are denied to any individual under the 24provisions of paragraph 2 of either subsection A or B of this 25Section for any week which begins on or after September 3, 1982 26and such individual is not offered a bona fide opportunity to   SB2213- 8 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1perform such services for the educational institution for the 2second of such academic years or terms, such individual shall 3be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week 4for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits as 5determined by the rules and regulations issued by the Director 6for the filing of claims for benefits, provided that such 7benefits were denied solely because of the provisions of 8paragraph 2 of either subsection A or B of this Section.9    2. If benefits on the basis of wages for service in 10employment in other than an instructional, research, or 11principal administrative capacity performed in an educational 12institution while in the employ of an educational service 13agency are denied to any individual under the provisions of 14subparagraph (a) of paragraph 4 of subsection B and such 15individual is not offered a bona fide opportunity to perform 16such services in an educational institution while in the 17employ of an educational service agency for the second of such 18academic years or terms, such individual shall be entitled to 19a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the 20individual filed a timely claim for benefits as determined by 21the rules and regulations issued by the Director for the 22filing of claims for benefits, provided that such benefits 23were denied solely because of subparagraph (a) of paragraph 4 24of subsection B of this Section.25    D. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section or 26paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 500 to the contrary,   SB2213- 9 -LRB104 12205 SPS 22310 b1with respect to a week of unemployment beginning on or after 2March 15, 2020, and before September 4, 2021 (including any 3week of unemployment beginning on or after January 1, 2021 and 4on or before June 25, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 5102-26)), benefits shall be payable to an individual on the 6basis of wages for employment in other than an instructional, 7research, or principal administrative capacity performed for 8an educational institution or an educational service agency 9under any of the circumstances described in this Section, to 10the extent permitted under Section 3304(a)(6) of the Federal 11Unemployment Tax Act, as long as the individual is otherwise 12eligible for benefits. 13(Source: P.A. 101-633, eff. 6-5-20; 102-26, eff. 6-25-21; 14102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2026.